Hawaii statutes.
[§11-316] Political activities
prohibited. (a) No commissioner or employee of the commission shall
participate in any political campaign, including making a contribution to a
candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee, during the commissioner's
term of office or employee's term of employment.

(b) Each commissioner and employee of the
commission shall retain the right to:

(1) Register and vote in any election;

(2) Participate in the nonpolitical activities of a
civic, community, social, labor, or professional organization, or of a similar
organization;

(3) Be a member of a political party or other
noncandidate political organization and participate in its activities to the
extent consistent with law; and

(4) Otherwise participate fully in public affairs,
except as prohibited by law, in a manner that does not materially compromise
the commissioner's or the employee's efficiency or integrity as a commissioner
or employee or the neutrality, efficiency, or integrity of the commission.

(c) Any commissioner or employee of the
commission may request an advisory opinion from the state ethics commission to
determine whether a particular activity constitutes or would constitute a
violation of the code of ethics under part II of chapter 84 or this section. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next